test.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Ton_a +Ton_á +Ton_à +Ton_ả +Ton_ã +Ton_ạ
+Cons_p +Cons_t +Cons_c +Cons_ch +Cons_m +Cons_n +Cons_ng +Cons_nh
+Redup +ToneRedup +ConsRedup

LEXICON Root
Word ;

LEXICON Word
Initials ;

LEXICON Initials
b : b Vowels ;
p : p Vowels ;
m : m Vowels ;
f : f Vowels ;
v : v Vowels ;
d : d Vowels ;
t : t Vowels ;
n : n Vowels ;
l : l Vowels ;
g : g Vowels ;
k : k Vowels ;
ng : ng Vowels ;
h : h Vowels ;
đ : đ Vowels ;
th : th Vowels ;
nh : nh Vowels ;
kh : kh Vowels ;
s : s Vowels ;
x : x Vowels ;
r : r Vowels ;
c : c Vowels ;
q : q Vowels ;
ch : ch Vowels ;
tr : tr Vowels ;
%0 : %0 Vowels ;

LEXICON Vowels
a : a Tones ;
ă : ă Tones ;
â : â Tones ;
e : e Tones ;
ê : ê Tones ;
i : i Tones ;
y : y Tones ;
o : o Tones ;
ô : ô Tones ;
ơ : ơ Tones ;
u : u Tones ;
ư : ư Tones ;

LEXICON Tones
+Ton_a : +Ton_a Finals RedupTypes ;
+Ton_á : +Ton_á Finals RedupTypes ;
+Ton_à : +Ton_à Finals RedupTypes ;
+Ton_ả : +Ton_ả Finals RedupTypes ;
+Ton_ã : +Ton_ã Finals RedupTypes ;
+Ton_ạ : +Ton_ạ Finals RedupTypes ;

LEXICON Finals
+Cons_p : +Cons_p ;
+Cons_t : +Cons_t ;
+Cons_c : +Cons_c ;
+Cons_ch : +Cons_ch ;
+Cons_m : +Cons_m ;
+Cons_n : +Cons_n ;
+Cons_ng : +Cons_ng ;
+Cons_nh : +Cons_nh ;
%0 : %0 ;

LEXICON RedupTypes

! 1. Full reduplication (repeat entire syllable)
+Redup : # ;

! 2. Tone-according reduplication
+ToneRedup : ToneRedupRule ;

! 3. Consonant-change reduplication
+ConsRedup : ConsRedupRule ;

LEXICON ToneRedupRule

! Tone change rules (non-flat → flat)

+Ton_a : +Ton_á Redup ;
+Ton_a : +Ton_ả Redup ;

+Ton_à : +Ton_ã Redup ;
+Ton_à : +Ton_ạ Redup ;

! For other tones, just keep as is (or extend here if needed)
+Ton_á : +Ton_á Redup ;
+Ton_ả : +Ton_ả Redup ;
+Ton_ã : +Ton_ã Redup ;
+Ton_ạ : +Ton_ạ Redup ;
+Ton_ả : +Ton_ả Redup ;
+Ton_ã : +Ton_ã Redup ;

LEXICON ConsRedupRule

! Consonant + tone change rules

+Cons_m +Ton_a : +Cons_p +Ton_á Redup ;
+Cons_m +Ton_a : +Cons_p +Ton_ả Redup ;

+Cons_n +Ton_a : +Cons_t +Ton_á Redup ;
+Cons_n +Ton_a : +Cons_t +Ton_ả Redup ;

+Cons_ng +Ton_à : +Cons_c +Ton_ã Redup ;
+Cons_ng +Ton_à : +Cons_c +Ton_ạ Redup ;

+Cons_nh +Ton_à : +Cons_ch +Ton_ã Redup ;
+Cons_nh +Ton_à : +Cons_ch +Ton_ạ Redup ;

! Default fallback - no change
+Cons_m +Ton_á : +Cons_m +Ton_á Redup ;
+Cons_n +Ton_á : +Cons_n +Ton_á Redup ;
+Cons_ng +Ton_ã : +Cons_ng +Ton_ã Redup ;
+Cons_nh +Ton_ã : +Cons_nh +Ton_ã Redup ;

LEXICON Redup

! After reduplication, stop
# ;

END
